src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_56HEIKELEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ heikelemä:heikel
!! * Yaml: __heikelemae56__
+V:e FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:ʼ V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iäq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;


LEXICON V_57TAPLÕMA
!! taplõma:tapõl
!! * Yaml: __taplwma57__
+V:%^Pen%^VowRMõ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRMõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRMõ BACK_V2N_minõ ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRMõ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;


LEXICON V_57KIIRDLEMÄ 
!! kiirdlemä:tapõl
!! * Yaml: __kiirdlemae57__
+V:%^Pen%^VowRMe FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRMe FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRMe FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ;


LEXICON V_58HIRNAHTAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hirnahtama:hirnahta
!! * Yaml: __V-hirnahtama58__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V:%^VowRM%>õ BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^VowRM%>õ BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_59KAOTAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kaotama:kaota
!!
+V:%^Pen%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK ; !!= * @CODE@ +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaoda
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Act+Ind+ConNegII, +Act+Imprt+Sg2

+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, 
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2

+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3

+V:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i   BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+V:%^VowRM%>i BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1,
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+V:%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ; !!= * @CODE@ +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotʼ
!! +V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotʼ BACK_K ;

+V: MUTUAL_JUS ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC-ALL_nuq ;

+V:%^VowRM%>õ BACK_KAOTAMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;
!! +Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!! +Pss+PrsPrc, +Pss+PrfPrc

+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;

+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_ZEROq ;


LEXICON V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ
!! Based on 59KAOTAMA
!! * Yaml: __kerguetaemae__
!!
+V:%^Pen%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Act+Ind+ConNegII

+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, 
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2

+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3

+V:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i   FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+V:%^VowRM%>i FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2, +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1,
!! +Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2, +Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3

+V:%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ; !!= * @CODE@ +Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotʼ
!! +V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotʼ FRONT_K ;

+V: MUTUAL_JUS ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC-ALL_nüq ;

+V:%^VowRM%>e FRONT_KAOTAMA-PSS-DISTRIBUTION ;
!! +Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!! +Pss+PrsPrc, +Pss+PrfPrc

+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;

+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;


LEXICON V_60MANITSÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ manitsõma:mani
!! * Yaml: __manitswma60,manitswma61>manitswma__
+V:dsõ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:dsõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:tsõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:ds V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:ts BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:tsõ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:ts BACK_INF_aq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:tsõ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V:ts BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:tsõ%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_60EHITSEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ehitsemä:ehii
!! * Yaml: __manitswma60,manitswma61>manitswma__
+V:dse FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:dse FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:tse FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:ds V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:ts FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:tse FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:ts FRONT_INF_äq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:tse FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V:ts FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:tse%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_62ARGNÕMA
!! argnõma:arg
!! * Yaml: __argnwma62__
+V:nõ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:s V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:õ BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:nõ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:õ%^WGStem BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:õ%^WGStem BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V:õ%^WGStem BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:õ%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_62TÄRKNEMÄ
!! tärknemä:tärk
!! * Yaml: __taerknemae62__
+V:ne FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:s V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:e FRONT_IND-PRT-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:ne FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:e%^WGStem FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:e%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V:e%^WGStem FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:e%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_63SÕIMAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sõimama:sõima
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: back
!! * Yaml: __V-swimama63__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM%>s V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ; 
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_sʼ ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
