src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
algnõma:alg V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
argnõma:arg V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
halõtsõma:halõ V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
hapnõma:hap V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
hapsama:hapsa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
haugutama:hauguta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
heidütämä:heidütä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
herendämä:herendä V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
higitsemä:higi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
hiiletämä:hiiletä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
hiitelemä:hiitel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
hilplõma:hilpõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
hurjama:hurja V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
hursʼatama:hursʼata V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
häitsnemä:häits V_62TÄRKNEMÄ  "" ;
häälitsemä:hääli V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
hõkõrdama:hõkõrda V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
höüstelemä:höüstel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
hükütämä:hükütä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
hürelemä:hürel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
hürmelemä:hürmel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
igritsemä:igri V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
immitsemä:immi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
jahtʼlõma:jahtel V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
jairama:jaira V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
joonitsõma:jooni V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
joositama:joosita V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
jungõrdama:jungõrda V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
kahtlõma:kahtl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
kaksama:kaksa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
karvatama:karvata V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
kavatsõma:kava V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
kergendämä:kergendä V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
kiirdlemä:keerdel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
kimplõma:kimpõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
kinnitämä:kinnitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
koksama:koksa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
koobitsõma:koobi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
kriimama:kriima V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
krumbitsõma:krumbi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
krʼanglõma:krʼangõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
kudritsõma:kudri V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
kulõtama:kulõta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
kurahtama:kurahta V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
kängitsemä:kängi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
kärkelemä:kärkel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
kärätsemä:kärä V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
köhkätämä:köhkätä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
laabitsõma:laabi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
lapsama:lapsa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
leebitsemä:leebi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
loputama:loputa V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
luibõrdama:luibõrda V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
läkkelemä:läkkel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
lämmitämä:lämmitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
maadlõma:maadõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
mustnõma:must V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
mässelemä:mässel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
mütskelemä:mütskel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
nessitämä:nessitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
nigritsemä:nigri V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
niksahtama:niksahta V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
nilgnõma:nilg V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
nilgõma:nilgõ V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
nilplõma:nilpõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
nimitsemä:nimi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
nipsama:nipsa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
nirmõtama:nirmõta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
nokitsõma:noki V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
nuhtlõma:nuhtõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
nälbelemä:nälbel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
näpitsemä:näpi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
nürdsütämä:nürdsütä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
peegeldämä:peegeldä V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
peritsemä:peri V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
pesselemä:pessel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
piislemä:peesel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
pitsatama:pitsata V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
pokitsõma:poki V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
pommama:pomma V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
potlõma:potõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
prähklemä:prähkel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
prääditämä:prääditä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
pussahtama:pussahta V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
püürdlemä:püürdel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
rahatama:rahata V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
rihitsemä:rihi V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
ripnõma:rip V_62ARGNÕMA  "" ;
roobitsõma:roobi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
rungama:runga V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
rämpelemä:rämpel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
röhütämä:röhütä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
servähtämä:servähtä V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
soritsõma:sori V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
säädelemä:säädel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
sõidutama:sõiduta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
taplõma:tapõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
teritsemä:teri V_60EHITSEMÄ  "" ;
tiitämä:tiitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
tillama:tilla V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
toskõrdama:toskõrda V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
tsapitsõma:tsapi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
tsilgutama:tsilguta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
tsiplõma:tsipõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
tsiuksama:tsiuksa V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
tsägelemä:tsägel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
tsʼuhahtama:tsʼuhahta V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
tuugõlõma:tuugõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
täitämä:täitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
tärknemä:tärknemä V_62TÄRKNEMÄ  "" ;
tõrgutama:tõrguta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
tüünelemä:tüünel V_56HEIKELEMÄ  "" ;
uhjama:uhja V_63SÕIMAMA  "" ;
vipsahtama:vipsahta V_58HIRNAHTAMA  "" ;
vissitämä:vissitä V_59KERGÜTÄMÄ  "" ;
vähkremä:vähker V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
väärdlemä:väärdel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
võitlõma:võitõl V_57TAPLÕMA  "" ;
võngutama:võnguta V_59KAOTAMA  "" ;
õhitsõma:õhi V_60MANITSÕMA  "" ;
ütlemä:ütel V_57KIIRDLEMÄ  "" ;
